Utah statutes.
58-76-602.   Geologic maps, cross-sections, reports, and documents to be sealed.

(1)  Any final geologic map, cross-section, or report prepared in this state shall bear the seal of a professional geologist licensed under this chapter, except as provided in Section 58-76-304.

(2)  Any final geologic map, cross-section, sketch, drawing, plan, or report prepared by, or under the supervision of, a professional geologist shall bear the seal of the professional geologist when submitted to a client or when filed with public authorities, even if the practice is exempt from licensure under Section 58-76-304.



Enacted by Chapter 218, 2002 General Session

